Utah statutes.
77-30-26.   Prosecution not limited to crime specified in requisition.
After a person has been brought back to this state by or after waiver of
extradition proceedings he may be tried in this state for other crimes which
he may be charged with having committed here as well as that specified in the
requisition for his extradition.
